Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1254.07
Boating
under influence of alcoholic
liquor or drug; violation of city or village ordinance; fee for
test; court costs.

Upon the conviction of any
person for violation of section 37-1254.01 or for being in the actual physical control of a motorboat or personal watercraft under
propulsion upon the waters of this state while under the influence of alcohol
or of any drug in
violation of any city or village ordinance, there shall be assessed as part
of the court costs the fee charged by any physician or any agency administering
tests, pursuant to a permit issued in accordance with section 37-1254.05,
for the test administered and the analysis thereof pursuant to section 37-1254.02
if such test was actually made.

Laws 1989, LB 195, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 14.